Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB622.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 45A.030 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this code, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Business" means any corporation, partnership, individual, sole proprietorship, joint stock company, joint
venture, or any other legal entity through which business is conducted;
(2) "Change order" means a written order signed by the purchasing officer, directing the contractor to make
changes that the changes clause of the contract authorizes the purchasing officer to order without the consent
of the contractor;
(3) "Chief purchasing officer" means the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, who shall be
responsible for all procurement of the Commonwealth except as provided by KRS Chapters 150, 175, 175B,
176, 177, and 180;
(4) "Construction" means the process of building, altering, repairing, improving, or demolishing any public
structures or buildings, or other public improvements of any kind to any public real property. It does not
include the routine maintenance of existing structures, buildings, or real property;
(5) "Construction manager-agency" means services to assist the purchasing agency manage construction that are
procured through a contract that is qualifications-based;
(6) "Construction management-at-risk" means a project delivery method in which the purchasing officer enters
into a single contract with an offeror that assumes the risk for construction at a contracted guaranteed
maximum price as a general contractor, and provides consultation and collaboration regarding the construction
during and after design of a capital project. The contract shall be subject to the bonding requirements of KRS
45A.190;
(7) "Construction manager-general contractor" means a project delivery method in which the purchasing officer
enters into a single contract with an offeror to provide preconstruction and construction services. During the
preconstruction phase, the successful offeror provides design consulting services. During the construction
phase, the successful offeror acts as general contractor by:
(a) Contracting with subcontractors; and
(b) Providing for management and construction at a fixed price with a completion deadline;
(8) "Contract" means all types of state agreements, including memoranda of agreement, grants, and orders, for
the acquisition, purchase, or disposal of supplies, services, construction, or any other item. It includes: awards;
contracts of a fixed-price, cost, cost-plus-a-fixed-fee, contingency fee, or incentive type; contracts providing
for the issuance of job or task orders; leases; letter contracts; purchase orders; public-private partnership
agreements; program administration contracts; personal service contracts; and insurance contracts except as
provided in KRS 45A.022. It includes supplemental agreements with respect to any of the foregoing;
(9) "Contract modification" means any written alteration in the specifications, delivery point, rate of delivery,
contract period, price, quantity, or other contract provisions of any existing contract, whether accomplished by
unilateral action in accordance with a contract provision or by mutual action of the parties to the contract. It
includes bilateral actions, such as supplemental agreements, and unilateral actions, such as change orders,
administrative changes, notices of termination, and notices of the exercise of a contract option;
(10) "Contractor" means any person having a contract with a governmental body;
(11) "Data" means recorded information, regardless of form or characteristic;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(12) "Design-bid-build" means a project delivery method in which the purchasing officer sequentially awards
separate contracts, the first for architectural, engineering, or engineering-related services to design the project
and the second for construction of the capital project according to the design. The contract shall be subject to
the bonding requirements of KRS 45A.185;
(13) "Design-build" means a project delivery method in which the purchasing officer enters into a single contract
for design and construction of a capital project. The contract shall be subject to the bonding requirements of
KRS 45A.190;
(14) "Designee" means a duly authorized representative of a person holding a superior position;
(15) "Document" means any physical embodiment of information or ideas, regardless of form or characteristic,
including electronic versions thereof;
(16) "Employee" means an individual drawing a salary from a governmental body, whether elected or not, and any
nonsalaried individual performing personal services for any governmental body;
(17) "Governmental body" means any department, commission, council, board, bureau, committee, institution,
legislative body, agency, government corporation, or other establishment of the executive or legislative branch
of the state government;
(18) "Meeting" means all gatherings of every kind, including video teleconferences;
(19) "Negotiation" means contracting by either the method set forth in KRS 45A.085, 45A.090, or 45A.095;
(20) "Person" means any business, individual, organization, or group of individuals;
(21) "Private partner" means any entity that is a partner in a public-private partnership other than:
(a) The Commonwealth of Kentucky, or any agency or department thereof;
(b) The federal government;
(c) Any other state government; or
(d) Any agency of a state, federal, or local government;
(22) "Procurement" means the purchasing, buying, renting, leasing, or otherwise obtaining of any supplies,
services, or construction. It includes all functions that pertain to the procurement of any supply, service, or
construction item, including description of requirements, selection and solicitation of sources, preparation and
award of contract, and all phases of contract administration;
(23) "Public-private partnership" means a project delivery method for construction or financing of capital projects,
as defined in KRS 45.750, or procurement of services, pursuant to a written public-private partnership
agreement entered into pursuant to KRS 45A.077 and administrative regulations promulgated thereunder,
between:
(a) At least one (1) private partner; and
(b) The Commonwealth of Kentucky, or any agency or department thereof;
(24) "Purchase request" or "purchase requisition" means that document whereby a using agency requests that a
contract be obtained for a specified need, and may include, but is not limited to, the technical description of the
requested item, delivery schedule, transportation, criteria for evaluation of solicitees, suggested sources of
supply, and information supplied for the making of any written determination and finding required by KRS
45A.025;
(25) "Purchasing agency" means any governmental body that is authorized by this code or its implementing
administrative regulations or by way of delegation from the chief purchasing officer to contract on its own
behalf rather than through the central contracting authority of the chief purchasing officer;
(26) "Purchasing officer" means any person authorized by a governmental body in accordance with procedures
prescribed by administrative regulations to enter into and administer contracts and make written
determinations and findings with respect thereto. The term includes an authorized representative acting within
the limits of authority;
(27) "Services" means the rendering by a contractor of its time and effort rather than the furnishing of a specific end
product, other than reports that are merely incidental to the required performance of services;

CHAPTER 162 3
(28) "Supplemental agreement" means any contract modification that is accomplished by the mutual action of the
parties;
(29) "Supplies" means all property, including but not limited to leases of real property, printing, and insurance,
except land or a permanent interest in land;
(30) "Using agency" means any governmental body of the state that utilizes any supplies, services, or construction
purchased under this code;
(31) "Video teleconference" means one (1) meeting, occurring in two (2) or more locations, where individuals can
see and hear each other by means of video and audio equipment; and
(32) "Writing" or "written" means letters, words, or numbers, or their equivalent, set down by handwriting,
typewriting, printing, photostating, photographing, magnetic impulse, mechanical or electronic recording, or
other form of data compilation.
Section 2. KRS 45A.035 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall have power and authority over, and may, except
as otherwise expressly provided in this code, adopt regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A and consistent
with this code governing the purchasing, management, and control of any and all supplies, services, and
construction, and other items required to be purchased by the Commonwealth. The secretary shall consider and
decide matters of policy with regard to state procurement. The secretary shall have the power of review with
respect to the implementation of administrative regulations and policy determinations.
(2) Administrative regulations shall be promulgated[adopted] governing the following:
(a) Conditions and procedures for delegations of purchasing authority;
(b) Prequalification, suspension, debarment, and reinstatement of prospective bidders;
(c) Small purchase procedures;
(d) Conditions and procedures for the purchase of items for resale;
(e) Conditions and procedures for the purchase of agricultural products in accordance with KRS 45A.645;
(f) Conditions and procedures for the use of source selection methods authorized by this code, including
emergency purchases;
(g) Opening and rejection of bids or offers, consideration of alternate bids, and waiver of informalities in
offers;
(h) Confidentiality of technical data and trade secrets information submitted by actual or prospective
bidders or offerors;
(i) Partial, progressive, and multiple awards;
(j) Supervision of storerooms and inventories, including determination of appropriate stock levels and the
management, transfer, sale, or other disposal of state-owned property;
(k) Definitions and classes of contractual services and procedures for acquiring them;
(l) An appeals process to resolve disputes arising from specifications requiring items deemed to be
equivalent or a sole brand as specified in KRS 45A.170;**[[] and[]]**
(m) Use of reverse auctions as defined in KRS 45A.070**[; and
(n) Policies and procedures governing timely payments, partial payments, reimbursement, and dispute
resolution for contract payments in violation of KRS 45.453 and Section 3 of this Act]**.
The secretary may promulgate[adopt such] other administrative regulations as deemed advisable to carry out
the purposes of this code.
**[SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 45A IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Purchasing agency" means a unit or body of state government that actually receives goods or
services from a contractor or vendor; and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(b) "Undisputed amount" means a good-faith, valid, accurate, and timely request for payment that has
been submitted to an entity owing money, and for which the entity has reviewed and confirmed that
the money is due and owing.
(2) In accordance with KRS 45.451, all contracts shall include a section that addresses timely payments,
including but not limited to the following specific provisions:
(a) Any undisputed amount shall be paid:
1. Within thirty (30) business days of receipt of the goods, services, or contractor's invoice; or
2. In accordance with the negotiated payment terms of the contract;
(b) Penalties for payment of undisputed amounts not timely received shall be:
1. In accordance with KRS 45.454, and except as provided in KRS 371.405, an interest penalty of
one percent (1%) shall be applied and added to any undisputed amount for each month or
fraction thereof after the thirty (30) business days following the receipt of the goods or services
or receipt of the invoice by the purchasing agency; or
2. In accordance with the payment terms of the contract;
(c) Partial payment terms shall be included to:
1. Allow disbursement of partial payment for undisputed amounts in the invoice or an agreed-
upon payment process for goods received or services performed that are not rejected or
deficient; or
2. Not allow disbursement of partial payment for goods received or services performed that are
not rejected or deficient; and
(d) When invoices are utilized for payment, terms shall be included for the invoice requirements,
including form, format, delivery, necessary information, supporting documentation, and
communication and notification procedures for complete invoices.
(3) (a) The purchasing agency shall make a good-faith effort of notifying the contractor or vendor that an
invoice has been rejected, of any errors in an invoice, or any requirement of additional or missing
information in an invoice within fifteen (15) business days from receipt of the goods, services, or
invoice, or in accordance with the terms of the contract.
(b) 1. If the purchasing agency transmits a rejection notice to the contractor or vendor, there shall
be a ten (10) calendar day correction period for the contractor or vendor to remedy any
problems in the delivery of a good or service or submit a corrected invoice to fulfill the
approval requirements. Utilization of the ten (10) calendar day correction period shall not
create a new date of submission or receipt for all items included in the invoice or terms of the
contract and shall not be considered a new invoice for calculation of the late payment fee
pursuant to KRS 45.454.
2. If a contractor or vendor fails to remedy the problem with the good or service, or fails to
submit a corrected invoice within the ten (10) calendar day correction period, the submitted
invoice shall be considered a new invoice for calculation of the late payment fee pursuant to
KRS 45.454.
(c) In accordance with KRS 45.458, the payment of interest penalty shall be paid by the purchasing
agency and the amount of the payments shall not be deducted from the contract budget, and
modifications shall not be made to the budget of the contract, the total award of the contract, funds
encumbered or obligated for the contract, or total amount available to fulfill the contract agreement
as awarded by the contracting agency.
(4) If a contractor or vendor has not received payment within thirty (30) business days for an undisputed
amount and has executed a loan, line of credit, revolving credit, or other financial instrument in order to
fulfill the obligations and continue performance of the contract, the contractor or vendor may recover from
the purchasing agency the interest and costs of credit borne until the date payment has been issued.
(5) The secretary shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A no later
than December 31, 2025, to implement this section. The administrative regulations shall include:

CHAPTER 162 5
(a) Procedures for correcting an invoice submission error when the purchasing agency does not reject
the goods or services received;
(b) Procedures for partial payment of invoices by a purchasing agency for portions of an invoice; and
(c) A contract dispute process, consistent with KRS 45A.235, to resolve late payment claims by
contractors or vendors that includes:
1. The method and manner disputes shall be submitted to the purchasing agency for resolution
by the secretary;
2. Information required to be included when a contractor or vendor submits a dispute; and
3. The time period by which the purchasing agency shall submit a response.
(6) The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall make the contract dispute process to resolve a late payment
claim and instructions for vendors and contractors available on its website no later than December 31,
2025.
(7) (a) Beginning on July 1, 2027, the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall submit a written report
every six (6) months to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to:
1. The Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue, or House and Senate Standing
Committees on Appropriations and Revenue, as appropriate; and
2. The Interim Joint Committee on State Government, or Senate Standing Committee on State
and Local Government and House Standing Committee on State Government, as appropriate.
(b) The report shall include the quantity of late payment contract disputes submitted to the secretary of
the Finance and Administration Cabinet, including but not limited to:
1. Purchasing agency at issue;
2. Unpaid amount alleged or disputed;
3. Duration of late payment claimed; and
4. Determination issued.]**
Section 4. 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 173, sec. 1, subsec. (173), at page 1764, as amended by 2024 Kentucky Acts
Chapter 223, Section 25, at page 2345, is amended to read as follows:
(173) $50,000,000 in fiscal year 2024-2025 to the Economic Development budget unit to support the
Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority Loan Pool. Of this amount $30,000,000[The appropriation
contained in this subsection] shall be used to provide funding to the City of Elizabethtown for the Valley Creek
Treatment Expansion Project.[Hardin and Warren Counties, communities experiencing significant economic
development growth due to announced projects with investments exceeding $2,000,000,000 for supporting critical
infrastructure improvements, such as water and sewer requirements, for continued economic development. Assistance
may be in the form of a loan with the ability for forgiveness due to meeting negotiated requirements related to
increased economic development for the community.] The remaining[Of this amount,] $20,000,000 shall be
allocated to the Intermodal Transportation Authority, Inc. for the project at the Kentucky Transpark and
surrounding areas. The funds shall be used to support communities experiencing economic development growth
due to announced projects with investments exceeding $2,000,000,000. Assistance may be in the form of a loan
with the ability for forgiveness due to meeting negotiated requirements related to increased economic development
for the community;
Section 5. 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 173, sec. 1, subsec. (179), at page 1765 is amended to read as follows:
(179) $10,000,000 in fiscal year 2024-2025 to the Economic Development budget unit to be allocated to the
Grayson County Fiscal Court[Leitchfield Grayson County Airport] to purchase acreage for the expansion of
runways to promote economic growth;
Section 6. 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 175, Part I, Operating Budget, C. Department of Education, 3. Learning and
Results Services, (16) School Resource Officers, at page 1836, is amended to read as follows:
(16) School Resource Officers: (a) Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $16,500,000 in
fiscal year 2024-2025 and $18,000,000 in fiscal year 2025-2026 to the Kentucky Department of Education to assist
local districts in funding salaries for school resource officers, as defined in KRS 158.441, on a reimbursement basis.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Once each local district has staffed and continues to maintain one school resource officer for each campus in that
district, the local district is then eligible to apply for reimbursement for additional assistance in funding salaries
for school resource officers, except that the assistance allowed under this paragraph shall be limited to:
1. Funding available in this subsection; and
2. No more than one school resource officer for each academic building.
Monthly grants shall first be applied to the per campus requirement across all local districts and then to districts
that meet the per campus requirement and have additional school resource officers, but only to the extent that
funding is available. The Kentucky Department of Education shall reimburse local school districts up to $20,000 for
each[ campus employing at least one on-site] full-time certified school resource officer. Notwithstanding KRS
45.229, any portion of General Fund not expended for this purpose shall lapse to the Budget Reserve Trust Fund
Account (KRS 48.705). Mandated reports shall be submitted pursuant to Part III, 24. of this Act.
**[(b) The Kentucky Department of Education shall assist nonpublic schools in funding salaries for school
officers. The Kentucky Department of Education shall pay a law enforcement agency or the Department of
Kentucky State Police up to $20,000 for each full-time certified school resource officer for which the nonpublic
school has entered into a memorandum of understanding for school resource officer services as a partial payment
of the total rate charged. These payments shall be deemed necessary government expenses and up to $5,000,000 in
each fiscal year shall be paid from the General Fund Surplus Account (KRS 48.700) or the Budget Reserve Trust
Fund Account (KRS 48.705).
(c) Notwithstanding any statute to the contrary, a law enforcement agency or the Department of
Kentucky State Police shall charge the same total rate for school resource officer services to a local school district
and nonpublic schools, which shall be the rate charged to a local school district as of January 1, 2025.]**
Section 7. The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet may request up to $20,000,000 in
fiscal biennium 2024-2026 as additional funding for 2022 Kentucky Acts Chapter 199, Part II, Capital Projects
Budget, F., 2., 004. Capitol Campus Renovation-Phase 2. The additional funding shall be deemed a necessary
government expense and shall be paid from the General Fund Surplus Account (KRS 48.700) or the Budget Reserve
Trust Fund (KRS 48.705). Notwithstanding KRS 141.020(2)(a)2., any appropriation under this section from the
Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account established by KRS 48.705 shall not be identified as GF appropriations when
certifying the reduction conditions pursuant to KRS 141.020(2)(a)5. and (d)2. to 5.
Section 8. Section 21 of 2025 RS HB 695/VO is hereby repealed and shall have no legal effect.
Section 9. 2025 RS HJR 32/GA, Section 1, is amended to read as follows:
(1) The General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky hereby approves and authorizes the Office
of State Budget Director to release awards from the School Facility Assistance Fund in accordance with 2024 Ky.
Acts ch. 175, Part I, A., 27., (5) in the specified amounts to the following local school districts for fiscal year 2025-
2026:
(a) $3,837,000 to Adair County Schools;
(b) $2,679,000 to Augusta Independent;
(c) $21,563,000 to Bardstown Independent;
(d) $53,000 to Beechwood Independent;
(e) $7,917,000 to Fleming County Schools;
(f) $7,463,000 to Garrard County Schools;
(g) $25,348,000 to Harrison County Schools;
(h) $39,099,000 to Johnson County Schools;
(i) $9,870,000 to Marion County Schools;
(j) $2,959,000 to Powell County Schools;
(k) $5,851,000 to Somerset Independent;
(l) $24,000 to Walton Verona Independent; and
(m) $3,724,000 to Williamstown Independent.

CHAPTER 162 7
(2) Award amounts are 50 percent of the difference between the costs to construct, repair, or renovate
facilities and the amount of available local resources for school facility projects certified in the audit conducted
pursuant to 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 175, Part I, A., 22., (11). The funding allowed in this section shall not be more than
50 percent of the certified gap identified in the audit, and the cost to construct shall not deviate from the amount
listed in the audit, and any amounts not covered shall be locally funded. These facilities are A1 or A2 schools, are
ranked as a Priority 1 or 2 on the local school district's facility plan, are not athletic facilities, have been assigned a
BG number by the Kentucky Department of Education with a prefix value between 19 and 23, have begun or are
ready to start construction, and are in school districts that have levied a ten-cent equivalent tax dedicated to capital
improvements but remain unable to cash fund or to sufficiently support the required annual debt service for
replacement or renovation of the facilities as of January 1, 2024. Six of the 19 districts evaluated either failed to meet
the criteria or had sufficient local resources to cover construction, repair, or renovation costs.
Section 10. 2025 RS HJR 46/VO, Section 1, is amended to read as follows:
Notwithstanding KRS 48.100, 48.110, 48.300, and 176.430, this Joint Resolution in conjunction with 2024
Ky. Acts ch. 146, 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 147, and 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 153 shall constitute the Six-Year Road Plan. Any
County Priority Project identified in this Joint Resolution may be advanced to fiscal year 2024-2025, if funds are
available.
Section 11. KRS 141.383 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Above-the-line production crew" has the same meaning as in KRS 154.61-010;
(b) "Approved company" has the same meaning as in KRS 154.61-010;
(c) "Authority" has the same meaning as in KRS 154.61-010;
(d) "Below-the-line production crew" has the same meaning as in KRS 154.61-010;
(e) "Continuous film production" has the same meaning as in KRS 154.61-010;
(f) "Loan-out entity" has the same meaning as in KRS 154.61-010;
(g) "Qualifying expenditure" has the same meaning as in KRS 154.61-010;
(h) "Qualifying payroll expenditure" has the same meaning as in KRS 154.61-010;
(i) "Secretary" has the same meaning as in KRS 154.61-010; and
(j) "Tax incentive agreement" has the same meaning as KRS 154.61-010.
(2) (a) There is hereby created a tax credit against the tax imposed under KRS 141.020 or 141.040 and
141.0401, with the ordering of credits as provided in KRS 141.0205.
(b) The incentive available under paragraph (a) of this section is:
1. A refundable credit for applications approved prior to April 27, 2018;
2. A nonrefundable and nontransferable credit for applications approved on or after April 27, 2018,
but before January 1, 2022; and
3. A refundable credit for applications approved on or after January 1, 2022, if the provisions of
paragraph (c) of this subsection are met.
(c) 1. The total tax incentive approved under KRS 154.61-020 shall be limited to:
a. One hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) for calendar year 2018 and each calendar
year through the calendar year 2021;
b. Seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) for the calendar year 2022 and each calendar
year thereafter; and
c. Beginning with calendar year 2024, the amount in subdivision b. of this subparagraph
shall be allocated accordingly:
i. Twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) shall be allocated for all approved
companies with a continuous film production; and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
ii. On the first day of April 2025, and on April 1[July] of each calendar year
thereafter, any unused balance allocated under subpart i. of this subdivision for
continuous film productions shall be made available for all approved companies
with a motion picture or entertainment production.
2. To qualify for the refundable credit, all applicants shall:
a. Begin filming or production in Kentucky within six (6) months of approval by the
authority; and
b. Complete filming or production in Kentucky within two (2) years of their production start
date.
(3) An approved company may receive a refundable tax credit if:
(a) The department has received notification from the authority that the approved company has satisfied all
requirements of KRS 154.61-020 and 154.61-030; and
(b) The approved company has provided a detailed cost report and sufficient documentation to the
authority, which has been forwarded by the authority to the department, that:
1. The purchases of qualifying expenditures were made after the execution of the tax incentive
agreement; and
2. The approved company or loan-out entity has withheld income tax as required by KRS 141.310
on all qualified payroll expenditures, and remitted and certified the withheld amount to the
department.
(4) Interest shall not be allowed or paid on any refundable credits provided under this section.
(5) The department may promulgate administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A to administer this section.
(6) On or before September 1, 2010, and on or before each September 1 thereafter, for the immediately preceding
fiscal year, the department shall report to the authority and the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and
Revenue the names of the approved companies and the amounts of refundable income tax credit claimed.
(7) No later than September 1, 2021, and by November 1 every four (4) years thereafter, the department and the
Cabinet for Economic Development shall cooperatively provide historical data related to the tax credit allowed
in this section and KRS 154.61-020 and 154.61-030, including data items beginning with tax credits claimed
for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2018:
(a) The name of the taxpayer claiming the tax credit;
(b) The date that the application was approved and the date the filming or production was completed;
(c) The taxable year in which the taxpayer claimed the tax credit;
(d) The total amount of the tax credit, including any amount denied, any amount applied against a tax
liability, any amount refunded, and any amount remaining that may be claimed on a return filed in the
future;
(e) Whether the taxpayer is a Kentucky-based company as defined in KRS 154.61-010;
(f) Whether the taxpayer films or produces a:
1. Feature-length film, television program, or industrial film;
2. National touring production of a Broadway show; or
3. Documentary;
(g) Whether the filming or production was performed:
1. Entirely in an enhanced county; or
2. In whole or in part in any Kentucky county other than in an enhanced incentive county;
(h) The amount of qualifying expenditures incurred by the taxpayer;
(i) The amount of qualifying payroll expenditures paid to:
1. Resident below-the-line crew; and

CHAPTER 162 9
2. Nonresident below-the-line production crew;
including the number of crew members in each category;
(j) The amount of qualifying payroll expenditures paid to:
1. Resident above-the-line crew; and
2. Nonresident above-the-line crew;
including the number of crew members in each category; and
(k) A brief description of the type of motion picture or entertainment production project.
(8) The information required to be reported under this section shall not be considered confidential taxpayer
information and shall not be subject to KRS Chapter 131 or any other provisions of the Kentucky Revised
Statutes prohibiting disclosure or reporting of information.
Section 12. The unused balance identified in Section 11(2)(c)1.c.ii. of this Act as of the first day of April
2025 shall be allocated and made available for all approved companies with a motion picture or entertainment
production on or after the effective date of this Act.
Section 13. Whereas the provisions of this Act provide ongoing support for state government agencies and
their functions, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 4 to 8 and 10 to 12 of this Act take effect upon its
passage and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Vetoed in Part and non-vetoed provisions became law without Governor's signature April 10, 2025.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version